Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-721 Remedies for fraud.
Remedies for material misrepresentation or fraud include all remedies available
under this article for nonfraudulent breach. Neither rescission or a claim for
rescission of the contract for sale nor rejection or return of the goods shall
bar or be deemed inconsistent with a claim for damages or other remedy. [L
1965, c 208, §2-721; HRS §490:2-721]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next